Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-959
Cold storage plants; operation and extension; tax.

The city council or village board of trustees shall levy annually a sufficient tax to maintain, operate, and extend any cold storage or refrigeration plant as provided under section 17-956 and to provide for the payment of the interest on, and principal of, any bonds that may have been issued as provided in section 17-957.

Laws 1941, c. 24, § 3, p. 119;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-803;

R.S.1943, § 17-959;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 291.